Alaska, session 34, HB147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 08.45 is amended by adding new sections to read: 04 Sec. 08.45.033. Issuance of temporary endorsement. (a) The department 05 shall issue a temporary endorsement to a naturopath licensed under this chapter if the 06 licensee pays the application fee and furnishes evidence satisfactory to the department 07 that the licensee 08 (1) passed the elective pharmacology examination portion of the 09 Naturopathic Physicians Licensing Examination or another equivalent examination 10 approved by the department; and 11 (2) meets other applicable requirements established by the department 12 in regulation. 13 (b) A naturopath who holds a valid temporary endorsement issued under (a) of 14 this section and is supervised as required under (c) of this section may prescribe and 15 administer prescription drugs for preventive and therapeutic purposes, except as 01 provided in AS 08.45.050. 02 (c) A supervising physician shall review the prescription and administration of 03 drugs performed under (b) of this section by a naturopath holding a temporary 04 endorsement. The supervising physician shall evaluate and provide feedback to the 05 naturopath on the naturopath's ability to prescribe and administer drugs under (b) of 06 this section safely and in compliance with the law. 07 (d) A physician who holds a valid license under AS 08.64 may supervise a 08 naturopath under (c) of this section if the physician 09 (1) has been prescribing and administering prescription drugs for five 10 or more years; and 11 (2) documents the arrangement between the physician and the 12 naturopath on a form established by the department in regulation. 13 (e) Unless additional supervision is required by the department, after a 14 naturopath has been supervised under (c) of this section for one year, the supervising 15 physician shall submit a report to the department recommending that the department 16 issue an endorsement to the naturopath, require the naturopath to receive further 17 supervision, or deny the naturopath an endorsement. A temporary endorsement 18 terminates on the date the naturopath is issued or denied an endorsement under 19 AS 08.45.034. 20 Sec. 08.45.034. Issuance of endorsement. (a) Upon receiving a 21 recommendation that a naturopath be issued or denied an endorsement under 22 AS 08.45.033(e), the department shall issue or deny an endorsement to a naturopath 23 licensed under this chapter. Upon receiving a recommendation that a naturopath 24 requires further supervision under AS 08.45.033(e), the department may issue or deny 25 an endorsement to a naturopath licensed under this chapter or require the naturopath to 26 receive further supervision. 27 (b) A naturopath licensed under this chapter who holds a valid endorsement 28 issued under this section may prescribe and administer prescription drugs for 29 preventive and therapeutic purposes, except as provided in AS 08.45.050. 30 * Sec. 2. AS 08.45 is amended by adding new sections to read: 31 Sec. 08.45.037. Continuing education requirements. (a) The department 01 shall promote a high degree of competence in the practice of naturopathy in the state 02 by requiring every naturopath licensed under this chapter to fulfill continuing 03 education requirements. 04 (b) Before a license may be renewed, a naturopath licensed under this chapter 05 shall submit evidence to the department that continuing education requirements 06 prescribed by regulations adopted by the department have been met. Continuing 07 education requirements must be completed during the 24-month period immediately 08 preceding the application for renewal and include 60 hours of continuing education 09 approved by the department, at least 20 hours of which must be on the subject of 10 pharmacotherapy. 11 (c) The department may exempt a naturopath licensed under this chapter from 12 the requirements of (b) of this section upon an application by the naturopath giving 13 evidence satisfactory to the department that the naturopath is unable to comply with 14 the requirements because of extenuating circumstances. However, the department may 15 not exempt a naturopath from more than 15 hours of continuing education in a four- 16 year period. 17 Sec. 08.45.038. Standards for license renewal. The department shall renew a 18 license issued under this chapter to a licensee who 19 (1) applies on a form provided by the department and pays the required 20 fee; 21 (2) meets the continuing education requirements established under 22 AS 08.45.037; 23 (3) has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or no contest to, a crime 24 that adversely reflects on the licensee's ability or competency to practice as a 25 naturopath or that jeopardizes the safety or well-being of a patient; and 26 (4) has a current cardiopulmonary resuscitation certification. 27 * Sec. 3. AS 08.45.050 is amended to read: 28 Sec. 08.45.050. Restrictions on practice of naturopathy. A person who 29 practices naturopathy may not 30 (1) give, prescribe, or recommend in the practice 31 (A) a prescription drug, except as authorized by an 01 endorsement issued under AS 08.45.033 or 08.45.034; 02 (B) a controlled substance; 03 (C) a poison; 04 (D) a cancer chemotherapeutic drug; or 05 (E) an antipsychotic drug; 06 (2) engage in surgery; 07 (3) use the word "physician" in the person's title; 08 (4) administer therapeutic ionizing radiation or radioactive 09 substances. 10 * Sec. 4. AS 08.45.060 is amended to read: 11 Sec. 08.45.060. Grounds for disciplinary sanctions [SUSPENSION, 12 REVOCATION, OR REFUSAL TO ISSUE A LICENSE]. The department may, 13 after a hearing, impose a disciplinary sanction on a person licensed under this chapter 14 when the department finds that the licensee 15 (1) secured a license or endorsement through deceit, fraud, or 16 intentional misrepresentation; 17 (2) engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the 18 course of providing professional services or engaging in professional activities; 19 (3) advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner; 20 (4) has been convicted of a felony or other crime that affects the 21 licensee's ability to continue to practice competently and safely; 22 (5) failed to comply with this chapter, with a regulation adopted under 23 this chapter, or with an order of the department; 24 (6) continued to practice after becoming unfit due to 25 (A) professional incompetence; 26 (B) addiction or severe dependency on alcohol or a drug that 27 impairs the licensee's ability to practice safely; 28 (C) physical or mental disability; 29 (7) engaged in lewd or immoral conduct in connection with the 30 delivery of professional service to patients. 31 * Sec. 5. AS 08.45.070(a) is amended to read: 01 (a) When the department [IT] finds that a licensee under this chapter has 02 violated AS 08.45.040 - 08.45.050 or is guilty of an offense under AS 08.45.060, the 03 department may impose the following sanctions singly or in combination: 04 (1) permanently revoke the license to practice or endorsement held 05 by the licensee; 06 (2) suspend the license to practice or endorsement held by the 07 licensee for a determinate period of time; 08 (3) censure the licensee; 09 (4) issue a letter of reprimand to the licensee; 10 (5) place the licensee on probationary status and require the licensee to 11 (A) report regularly to the department on [UPON] matters 12 involving the basis of probation; 13 (B) limit practice to those areas prescribed; 14 (C) continue professional education until a satisfactory degree 15 of skill has been attained in areas determined by the department to need 16 improvement; 17 (6) impose limitations or conditions on the practice of the licensee. 18 * Sec. 6. AS 08.45.070(c) is amended to read: 19 (c) The department may summarily suspend a license or endorsement before 20 final hearing or during the appeals process if the department finds that the licensee 21 poses a clear and immediate danger to the public health and safety if the licensee 22 continues to practice. A licensee whose license or endorsement is suspended under 23 this section is entitled to a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings 24 (AS 44.64.010) not later than seven days after the effective date of the order. The 25 licensee may appeal the suspension after a hearing to a court of competent jurisdiction. 26 * Sec. 7. AS 08.45.080 is amended to read: 27 Sec. 08.45.080. Unlicensed or unendorsed practice a misdemeanor. Except 28 for a person licensed or authorized under another chapter of this title who 29 engages in practices for which that person is licensed or authorized under that 30 chapter, a [A] person who practices naturopathy in the state without a valid license or 31 who prescribes or administers drugs without a valid endorsement under 01 AS 08.45.033 or 08.45.034 [IN VIOLATION OF AS 08.45.010] is guilty of a class A 02 misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or 03 by imprisonment for not more than a year, or by both. 04 * Sec. 8. AS 08.45.090 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 08.45.090. Fraudulent license or endorsement. A person who obtains or 06 attempts to obtain a naturopathic license or endorsement by dishonest or fraudulent 07 means or who forges, counterfeits, or fraudulently alters a naturopathic license or 08 endorsement is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for 09 not more than six months, or by both. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.